Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.197

Highway.

Highway means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 87. Formerly RCW 46.04.431.]